src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s31_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - gera: # 
    gera+v1+V+Inf: gera
    gera+v1+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ger
    gera+v1+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: gjørdi
    gera+v1+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: gjørdu
    gera+v1+V+Sup: gjørt
    gera+v1+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: gjørdur
